test/src/morphology/N-kidd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩiđđ â-stem: # Noun 'hand' - full paradigm
     ǩiđđ+N+Sg+Nom: ǩiđđ
     ǩiđđ+N+Sg+Gen: ǩiiđ
     ǩiđđ+N+Sg+Acc: ǩiiđ
     ǩiđđ+N+Sg+Ill: ǩi′đđe
     ǩiđđ+N+Sg+Loc: ǩiiđâst
     ǩiđđ+N+Sg+Com: ǩiiđin
     ǩiđđ+N+Ess: ǩiđđân
     ǩiđđ+N+Par: ǩiđđâd
     ǩiđđ+N+Sg+Abe: ǩiiđtää
     ǩiđđ+N+Pl+Nom: ǩiiđ
     ǩiđđ+N+Pl+Gen: ǩiiđi
     ǩiđđ+N+Pl+Acc: ǩiiđid
     ǩiđđ+N+Pl+Ill: ǩiiđid
     ǩiđđ+N+Pl+Loc: ǩiiđin
     ǩiđđ+N+Pl+Com: ǩiiđivui′m
     ǩiđđ+N+Pl+Abe: ǩiiđitää
